lt-LT: Raketės medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglis; Anglies pluoštas; Stiklo pluoštas; Grafitas; Kevlaras; Metalas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliuretanas (PU); Kaučiukas; Termoplastinis elastomeras (TPE); Titanas; Mediena; Kita
zh-TW: 球拍材質: 鋁; 碳; 碳纖維; 玻璃纖維; 石墨; Kevlar; 金屬; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡膠; 熱塑性彈性體 (TPE); 鈦; 木材; 其他
fr: Matériau de la raquette: Aluminum; Carbone; Fibre de carbone; Fibre de verre; Graphite; Kevlar; Métal; Nylon; Plastique; Polyuréthane (PU); Caoutchouc; Élastomère thermoplastique (TPE); Titane; Bois; Autre
it: Materiale della racchetta: Alluminio; Carbonio; Fibra di carbonio; Vetroresina; Grafite; Kevlar; Metallo; Nylon; Plastica; Poliuretano (PU); Gomma; Elastomero termoplastico (TPE); Titanio; Legno; Altro
zh-CN: 球拍材质: 铝; 碳; 碳纤维; 玻璃纤维; 石墨; Kevlar; 金属; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡胶; 热塑性弹性体 (TPE); 钛; 木头; 其他
nl: Materiaal racket: Aluminium; Koolstof; Koolstofvezel; Glasvezel; Grafiet; Kevlar; Metaal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyurethaan (PU); Rubber; Thermoplastisch elastomeer (TPE); Titanium; Hout; Andere
de: Schlägermaterial: Aluminium; Kohlenstoff; Kohlenstofffaser; Fiberglas; Graphit; Kevlar; Metall; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Thermoplastisches Elastomer (TPE); Titan; Holz; Sonstiges
ko: 라켓 소재: 알루미늄; 탄소; 탄소 섬유; 유리 섬유; 흑연; Kevlar; 금속; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리우레탄(PU); 고무; 열가소성 엘라스토머(TPE); 티타늄; 목재; 기타
tr: Raket malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon; Karbon fiber; Fiberglas; Grafit; Kevlar; Metal; Plastik; Plastik; Poliüretan (PU); Kauçuk; Termoplastik elastomer (TPE); Titanyum; Ahşap; Diğer
pt-PT: Material da raquete: Alumínio; Carbono; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidro; Grafite; Kevlar; Metal; Náilon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Titânio; Madeira; Outro
nb: Racketmateriale: Aluminium; Karbon; Karbonfiber; Glassfiber; Grafitt; Kevlar; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Titan; Trevirke; Annet
sk-SK: Materiál rakety: Hliník; Uhlík; Uhlíkové vlákno; Sklolaminát; Grafit; Kevlar; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretán (PU); Guma; Termoplastický elastomér (TPE); Titán; Drevo; Iné
pt-BR: Material da raquete: Alumínio; Carbono; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidro; Grafite; Kevlar; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Elastômero termoplástico (TPE); Titânio; Madeira; Outro
ru: Материал ракетки: Алюминий; Углерод; Углеродное волокно; Стекловолокно; Графит; Кевлар; Металл; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиуретан (ПУ); Резина; Термопластичный эластомер (ТПЭ); Титан; Дерево; Другое
es: Material de la raqueta: Aluminio; Carbón; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidrio; Grafito; Kevlar; Metal; Nylon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Goma; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Titanio; Madera; Otros
cs: Materiál rakety: Hliník; Uhlík; Uhlíkové vlákno; Skelná vata; Grafit; Kevlar; Kov; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Guma; Termoplastický elastomer (TPE); Titanové; Dřevo; Jiné
fi: Mailan materiaali: Alumiini; Hiili; Hiilikuitu; Lasikuitu; Grafiitti; Kevlar; Metalli; Nailon; Muovi; Polyuretaani (PU); Kumi; Termoplastinen elastomeeri (TPE); Titaani; Puu; Muu
en: Racket material: Aluminum; Carbon; Carbon fiber; Fiberglass; Graphite; Kevlar; Metal; Nylon; Plastic; Polyurethane (PU); Rubber; Thermoplastic elastomer (TPE); Titanium; Wood; Other
sl-SI: Material loparja: Aluminij; Ogljik; Ogljikova vlakna; Steklena vlakna; Grafit; Kevlar; Kovina; Najlon; Plastika; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Titan; Les; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на ракета: Алуминий; Въглерод; Въглеродни влакна; Fiberglass; Графит; Кевлар; Метал; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиуретан (PU); Каучук; Термопластичен еластомер (TPE); Титан; Дърво; Други
ja: ラケット材質: アルミニウム; カーボン; カーボンファイバー; ガラス繊維; グラファイト; Kevlar; 金属; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリウレタン (PU); ゴム; 熱可塑性エラストマー (TPE); チタン; 木材; その他
ro-RO: Material rachetă: Aluminiu; Carbon; Fibră de carbon; Fibră de sticlă; Grafit; Kevlar; Metal; Nailon; Plastic; Poliuretan (PU); Cauciuc; Elastomer termoplastic (TPE); Titan; Lemn; Altele
sv: Racket - material: Aluminium; Kol; Kolfiber; Glasfiber; Grafit; Kevlar; Metall; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Titan; Trä; Övrigt
pl: Materiał rakiety: Aluminium; Węgiel; Włókno węglowe; Włókno szklane; Grafit; Kevlar; Metal; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Elastomer termoplastyczny (TPE); Titanium; Drewno; Inne
hu: Ütő anyaga: Alumínium; Szén; Szénszál; Üveggyapot; Grafit; Kevlár; Fém; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliuretán (PU); Gumi; Hőre lágyuló elasztomer (TPE); Titán; Fa; Egyéb
vi: Vật liệu vợt: Nhôm; Cacbon; Sợi carbon; Sợi thủy tinh; Than chì; Kevlar; Kim loại; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyurethane (PU); Cao su; Elastomer nhiệt dẻo (TPE); Titanium; Gỗ; Khác
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำแร็กเก็ต: อะลูมิเนียม; คาร์บอน; เส้นใยคาร์บอน; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; แกรไฟท์; Kevlar; โลหะ; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ยาง; เทอร์โมพลาสติกเอลาสโตเมอร์ (TPE); ไทเทเนียม; ไม้; อื่นๆ
da: Ketsjermateriale: Aluminum; Kulstof; Kulfiber; Glasfiber; Grafit; Kevlar; Metal; Nylon; Plast; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Titanium; Træ; Andet
el: Υλικό ρακέτας: Αλουμίνιο; Άνθρακας; Ανθρακόνημα; Υαλοβάμβακας; Γραφίτης; Kevlar; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Καουτσούκ; Θερμοπλαστικό ελαστομερές (TPE); Τιτάνιο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Materijal reketa: Aluminij; Ugljik; Karbonska vlakna; Stakloplastika; Grafit; Kevlar; Metal; Najlon; Plastika; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Titanij; Drvo; Ostalo